Vermont, session 2025-2026, H249.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 32 V.S.A. § 5811 is amended to read:
§ 5811. DEFINITIONS
VT LEG #379045 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.249
2025 Page 2 of 3
As used in this chapter unless the context requires otherwise:
* * *
(21) “Taxable income” means, in the case of an individual, federal
adjusted gross income determined without regard to 26 U.S.C. § 168(k) and:
* * *
(B) decreased by the following items of income (to the extent such
income is included in federal adjusted gross income):
* * *
(v) the amount of any federal deduction or credit that the taxpayer
would have been allowed for the cultivation, testing, processing, or sale of
cannabis or cannabis products as authorized under 7 V.S.A. chapter 33 or 37,
but for 26 U.S.C. § 280E; and
(vi) the amount of interest paid by a qualified resident taxpayer
during the taxable year on a qualified education loan for the costs of attendance
at an eligible educational institution; and
(vii) $1,000.00 of qualified expenses for enrollment of a student in
a home study program, provided the student is a dependent of the taxpayer as
defined under 26 U.S.C. § 152 and is not a dependent of another taxpayer; and
* * *
(30) As used in subdivision (21)(B)(vii) of this section, “qualified
expenses” means the cost of educational instruction, materials, equipment,
VT LEG #379045 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.249
2025 Page 3 of 3
software, and computer hardware required for use during the normal school
day when a dependent student is attending a home study program pursuant to
16 V.S.A. § 166b, whether in person or through distance learning.
Sec. 2. 32 V.S.A. § 5813 is amended to read:
* * *
(aa) The statutory purpose of the home study program deduction in
subdivision 5811(21)(B)(vii) of this title is to provide financial assistance to
Vermonters who provide home study programs to their dependents.
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
Notwithstanding 1 V.S.A. § 214, this act shall take effect retroactively on
January 1, 2025 and shall apply to taxable years beginning on and after
January 1, 2025.
VT LEG #379045 v.1